Idaho, session 2025, S1139.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-5109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-5109. POWERS OF THE COUNCIL -- STANDARDS OF TRAINING, EDUCATION AND
EMPLOYMENT OF PEACE OFFICERS -- CERTIFICATION -- PENALTIES. (1) It shall be
the duty of and the council shall have the power:
(a) To establish the requirements of minimum basic training that peace
officers shall complete in order to be eligible for permanent employ-
ment as peace officers and the time within which such basic training
must be completed. One (1) component of minimum basic training shall
be a course in the investigation and collection of evidence in cases
involving an allegation of sexual assault or battery;
(b) To establish the requirements of minimum education and training
standards for employment as a peace officer in probationary, temporary,
part-time, and/or emergency positions;
(c) To establish the length of time a peace officer may serve in a proba-
tionary, temporary, and/or emergency position;
(d) To approve, deny approval or revoke the approval of any institution
or school established by the state or any political subdivision or any
other party for the training of peace officers;
(e) To establish the minimum requirements of courses of study, at-
tendance, equipment, and facilities of all approved schools and the
scholastic requirement, experience, and training of instructors at all
approved schools;
(f) To establish such other requirements for employment, retention and
promotion of peace officers, including minimum age, physical and men-
tal standards, citizenship, moral character, experience and such other
matters as relate to the competence and reliability of peace officers;
(g) To certify peace officers as having completed all requirements es-
tablished by the council in order to be eligible for permanent employ-
ment as peace officers in this state;
(h) To receive and file for record copies of merit regulations or local
ordinances passed by any political subdivision;
(i) To maintain permanent files and transcripts for all peace officers
certified by the council to include any additional courses or advanced
courses of instruction successfully completed by such peace officers
while employed in this state and to include the law enforcement em-


ployment history by agency and dates of service of the officer. Such
information shall be made available to any law enforcement agency upon
request when a person applies for employment at the requesting law en-
forcement agency; and
(j) To allow a peace officer of a federally recognized Indian tribe
within the boundaries of this state to attend the peace officer stan-
dards and training academy if said peace officer meets minimum physical
and educational requirements of the academy. The Indian tribal law
enforcement agency shall reimburse the peace officer standards and
training academy for the officer's training. Upon satisfactory com-
pletion of the peace officer standards and training academy, the tribal
peace officer shall receive a certificate of satisfactorily completing
the academy.
(2) After January 1, 1974, any peace officer as defined in section
19-5101(d), Idaho Code, employed after January 1, 1974, except any elected
official or deputy serving civil process, the deputy director of the Idaho
state police, or any person serving under a temporary commission with any
law enforcement agency in times of natural or man-caused disaster declared
to be an emergency by the board of county commissioners or by the governor
of the state of Idaho, or those peace officers whose primary duties involve
motor vehicle parking and animal control pursuant to city or county ordi-
nance, or any peace officer acting under a special deputy commission from
the Idaho state police, shall be certified by the council within one (1) year
of employment; provided, however, that the council may establish criteria
different than that required of other peace officers for certification of
city police chiefs or administrators within state agencies having law en-
forcement powers who, because of the number of full-time peace officers they
supervise, have duties that are primarily administrative. Any such chief of
police or state agency administrator employed in such capacity prior to July
1, 1987, shall be exempt from certification.
(3) The council is designated as a criminal justice agency as defined in
section 67-3012(7)(A)(ii), Idaho Code, for the purposes of obtaining and re-
taining confidential criminal justice information by means of criminal jus-
tice services as defined in section 67-3012(8), Idaho Code. Such informa-
tion shall be used to provide for the certification, suspension or revoca-
tion of certification of peace officers and public safety personnel subject
to certification by the council. The council may not record or retain any
confidential criminal justice information without complying with the provi-
sions of chapter 30, title 67, Idaho Code.
(4) No peace officer shall have or exercise any power granted by any
statute of this state to peace officers unless such person shall have been
certified by the council within one (1) year of the date on which such per-
son commenced employment as a peace officer, except in cases where the coun-
cil, for good cause and in writing, has granted additional time to complete
such training. The council shall decertify any officer who is convicted of
any felony or offense that would be a felony if committed in this state. The
council may decertify any officer who:
(a) Is convicted of any misdemeanor;
(b) Willfully or otherwise falsifies or omits any information to obtain
any certified status; or


(c) Violates any of the standards of conduct as established by the coun-
cil's code of ethics, as adopted and amended by the council.
All proceedings taken by the council shall be conducted in accordance
with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(5) Any law enforcement agency as defined in section 19-5101(c), Idaho
Code, in which any peace officer shall resign as a result of any disciplinary
action or in which a peace officer's employment is terminated as a result of
any disciplinary action shall, within fifteen (15) days of such action, make
a report to the council.
(6) The council shall, pursuant to the requirements of this section,
establish minimum basic training and certification standards for county de-
tention officers that can be completed within one (1) year of employment as a
county detention officer.
(7) The council may, upon recommendation of the juvenile training coun-
cil and pursuant to the requirements of this section, implement minimum ba-
sic training and certification standards for juvenile detention officers,
juvenile probation officers, and employees of the Idaho department of juve-
nile corrections who are engaged in the direct care and management of juve-
niles.
(8) The council may, upon recommendation of the correction standards
and training council and pursuant to the requirements of this section, es-
tablish minimum basic training and certification standards for state cor-
rection officers and for adult probation and parole officers.
(9) The council may, upon recommendation from the misdemeanor pro-
bation training council and pursuant to the requirements of this section,
establish minimum basic training, continuing education, and certification
standards for misdemeanor probation officers, whether those officers are
employees of, or by private sector contract with, a county.
(10) The council may reject any applicant for certification who has been
convicted of a misdemeanor, and the. The council shall reject an applicant
for certification who has been convicted of a any felony, the punishment for
which could have been imprisonment in a federal or state penal institution
and that is either enumerated in section 18-310(2), Idaho Code, or is a sub-
stantially equivalent offense from a jurisdiction other than the state of
Idaho. The council may reject any applicant for certification who has been
convicted of a felony that has been set aside, expunged, or pardoned or re-
duced to a misdemeanor or dismissed pursuant to the terms of section 19-2604,
Idaho Code, or that is subject to the terms of a withheld judgment.
(11) As used in this section, "convicted" means a plea or finding of
guilt, notwithstanding the form of judgment or withheld judgment, regard-
less of whether the sentence is imposed, suspended, deferred or withheld,
and regardless of whether the plea or conviction is set aside or withdrawn or
the case is dismissed or reduced under section 19-2604, Idaho Code, or any
other comparable statute or procedure where the setting aside of the plea or
conviction, or dismissal or reduction of the case or charge, is based upon
lenity or the furtherance of rehabilitation rather than upon any defect in
the legality or factual basis of the plea, finding of guilt or conviction.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.